tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_gl.dic
ISO8859-1
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.odi1
.o3v
.g2
.p2
.ri1a
.ru1
.si1o
.vi1a
\'a1x
\'{\i}1a
\'{\i}1c
\'o1d
\'u1a
a1\'{\i}
a1a
a1e1
a1ia
a1io
a1ib
a1o
a1b
a1c
a1d
a1f
a1g
a1h
a1l
a1m
a2n1am
2ani
a1p
a1q
a1r
ar2l
a1t
a1v
a1x
a1z
e1\'~n
e1a
e1e
e1inc
e1o
e1un
e1b
e2bac
e1c
e1d
e1f
e1g
e1h
e1l
e1m
e1p
e1q
e1ra
er1am
e1re
e1ri
e1ro
e1ru
erce2
e1t
e1v
e1x
e1z
i1\'~n
i1ax
i1ei
i1oce
i1or.
i1osf
i1ox
1iu
i1b
i1c
i1d
i1f
i1g
i1h
i1k
i1l
i1m
i1p
ipe2
i1q
i1r
i1t
i1v
i1x
i1z
o1a
o1e
o1ia
o1io
o1o
o1b
o1c
oco2m
o1d
ode2s
odi1o
o1f
o1g
o1h
o1k
o1l
o2lag
o1m
o1p
o1q
o1ra
o1re
o1ri
o1ro
o1t
o1v
o2vo
o1x
o1z
u1ar.
u1enz
u1or
u1b
u2bad
u1c
u1d
u1f
u1g
u1l
u1m
u1p
uque2
u1r
u1t
u1v
u1x
u1z
2b.
bi2e
bi1om
2b1of
bu2b
bu1q
2b1h
2b1s
bser2
2b1x
2c.
co1in
co2be
co2v
co2x
2c1c
2c1d
2c1n
cre2b
2c1s
2c1t
di2q
2d1d
2d1v
2f.
fa1i
fi1a
fi2a.
fi2e
fo2x
2f1t
2g.
glo2b
2g1m
2g1n
2l.
la2i1o
le2o.
li1an
lo2i
lo2ba
lo2z
2l1b
2l1c
2l1d
2l1f
2l1g
2l1m
2l1n
2l1p
2l1q
2l1s
2l1t
2l1v
2l1x
2l1z
2m.
ma2i1
mo2mo
2m1b
mbi2q
mbo2l
2m1m
2m1n
2m1p
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
no2pi
1nu
n1c
n1d
n1f
n1g
n1l
n1m
n1n
n1q
n1r
n1s
n1t
n1v
n1x
n1z
2p.
per1r
pes2q
podi2
2p1n
pri1o
2p1s
2p1t
2r.
ra1ir
2rapt
r2i
ru1e
2r1b
2r1c
2r1d
2r1f
2r1g
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1p
2r1q
1rr
2r1s
2r1t
2r1v
2r1x
2r1z
2s.
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
su1e
s1b
2s1c
s1d
2s1f
s1g
s1ho
s1l
s1m
s1n
2s1p
s1q
2s1t
s1v
2t.
tedi1
2t1ing
to2pa
tudi1
2t1m
2t1n
tru2e
vado1
vi1ad
2x.
2x1c
2x1p
2x1t
2z.
